Utah statutes.
41-4-12.   Actions for damages.
In addition to the criminal and civil penalties herein provided, any person
who is injured in his business or property by any other person or corporation
or association or partnership, by reason of anything forbidden or declared to
be unlawful by this act, may sue therefor in any court having jurisdiction
thereof in the county where the defendant resides or is found, or any agent
resides or is found, or where service may be obtained, without respect to the
amount in controversy, and to recover twofold the damages by him sustained,
and the costs of suit. Whenever it shall appear to the court before which any
proceeding under this act is pending, that the ends of justice require that
other parties shall be brought before the court, the court may cause them to
be made parties defendant and summoned, whether they reside in the county
where such action is pending, or not.
